lexd_components/hyw-punctuation.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of punctuation
#### Tags based on https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols#Punctuation
#### Content based off https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Armenian_alphabet#Punctuation

PATTERNS 

NonInfixalPunctuation
InfixalPunctuation
Phonetic
EnglishOptions

# These are punctuation markers which are not inserted inside words
# But kept at the end of clauses or phrases
LEXICON NonInfixalPunctuation

։:<sent> 	# Sentence-ending punctuation, e.g. full stop, question mark

,:<cm> 		# Comma punctuation
«:<lquot>	# Left quote
»:<rquot>	# Right quote
(:<larp>	# Left parenthesis 
):<rpar> 	# Right parenthesis 	
՚:<apos>		# Apostrophe, mostly used for combining a function words with verbs

…:<clb>		# Ellipses
.:<clb>		# Acts like a semicolon
՝:<clb>		# A weaker boundary than a semicolon
★

֊:<guio>		# Rather outdated type of hyphen that's on Wikipedia, but not on keyboards
-:<guio>	# Normal hyphen
–:<guio>	# Longer hyphen, also used in English
—:<guio>	# Longest hyphen, also used in English. Connected sentences

##########################
##########################
##########################
##########################
# These are punctuation markers which are added on the stressed vowel of words
LEXICON InfixalPunctuation

՜:<punct>	# Elongated marker, often used in shouting out vocatives
՞:<punct>	# Question marker, often added to wh-words, polar question verbs, and the main questioned word in a question
՛:<punct>	# Imperative marker, added to imperative verbs and general shouting emphasis


##########################
##########################
##########################
##########################
#These are symbols which may be found in old or codeswitching documents
#These symbols would be added after a segment
LEXICON Phonetic
ՙ:<punct>	# Used to mark aspiration on colloquial codeswitching
՟:<punct>	# Obsolete abbreviation marker used at top of final segment


#########################
#########################
#########################
#########################
#These are punctuation symbols from a Latin keyboard which are often used
#Instead of the corresponding Armenian symbol because the symbols look
#Almost the same

LEXICON EnglishOptions
':<apost>	# English apostrophe
